Utah statutes.
53B-11-104.   Eligibility for student financial aid -- Filing of selective
service status.
(1)  A male born after December 31, 1959, may not receive any state-supported
loan, grant, or scholarship for attendance at a postsecondary institution
within the state unless he has filed a statement of selective service status
with the institution.
(2)  The statement shall certify one of the following:
(a)  that the male has registered with the selective service system in
accordance with the Military Selective Service Act, 50 U.S.C.  App.  453, as
amended;
(b)  that the male is not required to register with the selective service
system because he is:
(i)  under 18 or over 26 years of age;
(ii)  on active duty with the armed forces of the United States other than for
training in a reserve or national guard unit;
(iii)  a nonimmigrant alien lawfully in the United States in accordance with
the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101(a)(15); or
(iv)  not a citizen of the United States and is a permanent resident of the
Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands or the Northern Mariana Islands.
(3) (a)  The board of regents, through the commissioner of higher education,
shall specify the form of statement to be filed under Subsection (2).
(b)  Each statement shall contain a section:
(i)  certifying registration with the selective service system and a space for
the student to record his selective service number; and
(ii)  for the certification of nonregistration and for an explanation of the
reason for exemption.
(c)  The board may require documentation for the certifications under
Subsection (3)(b).
(4)  Postsecondary institutions within the state may not make or guarantee any
loan, grant, scholarship, or other state-supported financial assistance to a
male student unless the student has filed the statement required under
Subsection (1).
(5) (a)  If a postsecondary institution within the state has received a
statement certifying that the individual is registered under Subsection (2)(a)
or is exempt from registration for a reason other than he is under 18 years of
age, the individual is not required to file any further statement with the
institution under this section.
(b)  If the institution receives a statement of exemption because the
individual is under 18 years of age, it shall require the filing of a new
statement each time the individual seeks to apply for financial assistance for
educational expenses, until it receives a statement certifying that the
individual has registered with the selective service system or is exempt from
registration for a reason other than being under 18 years of age.
